North Carolina, session 2025, HB674.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The Firearms Liberty Act."

PART II. LIFETIME CONCEALED HANDGUN PERMITS
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 14-415.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.10. Definitions.
The following definitions apply to this Article:
(1) Carry a concealed handgun. – The term includes possession of a concealed
handgun.
(1a) Deployed or deployment. – Any military duty that removes a military
permittee from the permittee's county of residence during which time the
permittee's permit expires or will expire.
(1b) Fixed duration permit. – A concealed handgun permit issued in accordance
with the provisions of this Article and with a stated expiration date.
(2) Handgun. – A firearm that has a short stock and is designed to be held and
fired by the use of a single hand.
(2a) Lifetime permit. – A concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with the
provisions of this Article with no expiration date.
(2a)(2b) Military permittee. – A person who holds a permit who is also a member
of the Armed Forces of the United States, the reserve components of the
*H674-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Armed Forces of the United States, the North Carolina Army National Guard,
or the North Carolina Air National Guard.
(3) Permit. – A concealed handgun permit fixed duration permit or lifetime permit
issued in accordance with the provisions of this Article.
…."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 14-415.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.11. Permit to carry concealed handgun; scope of permit.
(a) Any person who has a concealed handgun permit to carry a concealed handgun may
carry a concealed handgun unless otherwise specifically prohibited by law. The person shall carry
the permit together with valid identification whenever the person is carrying a concealed
handgun, shall disclose to any law enforcement officer that the person holds a valid permit and
is carrying a concealed handgun when approached or addressed by the officer, and shall display
both the permit and the proper identification upon the request of a law enforcement officer. In
addition to these requirements, a military permittee with a fixed duration permit whose permit
has expired during deployment may carry a concealed handgun during the 90 days following the
end of deployment and before the permit is renewed provided the permittee also displays proof
of deployment to any law enforcement officer.
(b) The sheriff shall issue a permit to carry a concealed handgun to a person who qualifies
for a permit under G.S. 14-415.12. The A fixed duration permit shall be valid throughout the
State for a period of five years from the date of issuance. A lifetime permit shall be valid
throughout the State until revoked or surrendered.
…
(d) A person who is issued a permit shall notify the sheriff who issued the permit of the
county where the person resides of any change in the person's permanent address within 30 days
after the change of address. If a permit is lost or destroyed, the person to whom the permit was
issued shall notify the sheriff who issued the permit of the loss or destruction of the permit. A
person may obtain a duplicate permit by submitting to the sheriff a notarized statement that the
permit was lost or destroyed and paying the required duplicate permit fee."
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 14-415.14(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The sheriff shall make permit applications readily available at the office of the sheriff
or at other public offices in the sheriff's jurisdiction. The permit application shall be in triplicate,
in a form to be prescribed by the State Bureau of Investigation, and shall include the following
information with regard to the applicant: name, address, physical description, signature, date of
birth, social security number, military status, law enforcement status, and the drivers license
number or State identification card number of the applicant if used for identification in applying
for the permit. The application shall also indicate if the application is for a fixed duration permit
or a lifetime permit."
SECTION 2.4. G.S. 14-415.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.15. Issuance or denial of permit.
(a) Except as permitted under subsection (b) of this section, within 45 days after receipt
of the items listed in G.S. 14-415.13 from an applicant, and receipt of the required records
concerning the mental health or capacity of the applicant, the sheriff shall either issue or deny
the permit. The sheriff may conduct any investigation necessary to determine the qualification or
competency of the person applying for the permit, including record checks. The sheriff shall
make the request for any records concerning the mental health or capacity of the applicant within
10 days of receipt of the items listed in G.S. 14-415.13. No person, company, mental health
provider, or governmental entity may charge additional fees to the applicant for background
checks conducted under this subsection. A permit shall not be denied unless the applicant is
determined to be ineligible pursuant to G.S. 14-415.12.
(b) Upon presentment to the sheriff of the items required under G.S. 14-415.13 (a)(1),
(2), and (3), the sheriff may issue a temporary permit for a period not to exceed 45 days to a
Page 2 House Bill 674-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
person who the sheriff reasonably believes is in an emergency situation that may constitute a risk
of safety to the person, the person's family or property. The applicant may submit proof of a
protective order issued under G.S. 50B-3 for the protection of the applicant as evidence of an
emergency situation. The temporary permit may not be renewed and may be revoked by the
sheriff without a hearing.
(c) A person's application for a permit shall be denied only if the applicant fails to qualify
under the criteria listed in this Article. If the sheriff denies the application for a permit, the sheriff
shall, within 45 days, notify the applicant in writing, stating the grounds for denial. An applicant
may appeal the denial, revocation, denial of a permit or the nonrenewal of a fixed duration permit
by petitioning a district court judge of the district in which the application was filed. The
determination by the court, on appeal, shall be upon the facts, the law, and the reasonableness of
the sheriff's refusal. The determination by the court shall be final.final for the purpose of appeal."
SECTION 2.5. G.S. 14-415.16, as amended by Section 3.1 of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 14-415.16. Renewal of fixed duration permit.
(a) At least 45 days prior to the expiration date of a fixed duration permit, the sheriff of
the county where the permit was issued shall send a written notice to the permittee explaining
that the permit is about to expire and including information about the requirements for renewal
of the permit. The notice shall be sent by first class mail to the last known address of the
permittee. Failure to receive a renewal notice shall not relieve a permittee of requirements
imposed in this section for renewal of the permit.
(b) The holder of a fixed duration permit shall apply to renew the permit within the
90-day period prior to its expiration date by filing with the sheriff of the county in which the
person resides a renewal form provided by the sheriff's office, an affidavit stating that the
permittee remains qualified under the criteria provided in this Article, a newly administered full
set of the permittee's fingerprints, and a renewal fee. The renewal form shall indicate whether the
holder of the permit would like the renewal to be issued as a fixed duration permit or a lifetime
permit.
…
(e) If the permittee does not apply to renew the fixed duration permit prior to its
expiration date, but does apply to renew the permit less than 180 days after the permit expires,
the sheriff shall waive the requirement of taking another firearms safety and training course. If
the permittee applies to renew the permit between 180 days and one year after the permit expires,
the sheriff may waive the requirement of taking another firearms and safety training course. This
subsection does not extend the expiration date of the fixed duration permit.
(f) An applicant may appeal the nonrenewal of a fixed duration permit as provided in
G.S. 14-415.15(c)."
SECTION 2.6. G.S. 14-415.16A reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.16A. Permit extensions and renewals of fixed duration permits for deployed
military permittees.
(a) A deployed military permittee whose fixed duration permit will expire during the
permittee's deployment, or the permittee's agent, may apply to the sheriff for an extension of the
military permittee's permit by providing the sheriff with a copy of the permittee's proof of
deployment. Upon receipt of the proof, the sheriff shall extend the fixed duration permit for a
period to end 90 days after the permittee's deployment is scheduled to end. A fixed duration
permit that has been extended under this section shall be valid throughout the State during the
period of its extension.
(b) A military permittee's fixed duration permit that is not extended under subsection (a)
of this section and that expires during deployment shall remain valid during the deployment and
for 90 days after the end of the deployment as if the permit had not expired. The military permittee
House Bill 674-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
may carry a concealed handgun during this period provided the permittee meets all the
requirements of G.S. 14-415.11(a).
(c) A military permittee under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section shall have
90 days after the end of the permittee's deployment to renew the fixed duration permit. In addition
to the requirements of G.S. 14-415.16, the permittee shall provide to the sheriff proof of
deployment. The sheriff shall renew the permit upon receipt of this documentation provided the
permittee otherwise remains qualified to hold a concealed handgun permit."
SECTION 2.7. Article 54B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-415.16B. Reissuance of a lifetime permit as a fixed duration permit.
The holder of a lifetime permit may apply at any time to have the lifetime permit reissued as
a fixed duration permit. An application for reissuance shall be submitted by the permittee and
considered by the sheriff in the same manner as an application for renewal of a fixed duration
permit pursuant to the applicable provisions of G.S. 14-415.16."
SECTION 2.8. G.S. 14-415.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.17. Permit; sheriff to retain a list of permittees; confidentiality of list and permit
application information; availability to law enforcement agencies.
(a) The permit shall be in a certificate form, as prescribed by the State Bureau of
Investigation, that is approximately the size of a North Carolina drivers license. It shall bear the
signature, name, address, date of birth, and the drivers license identification number used in
applying for the permit. A lifetime permit shall bear a clear indication of its lifetime duration on
its face. A fixed duration permit shall bear the expiration date of the permit on its face.
(b) The sheriff shall maintain a listing, including the identifying information, of those
persons who are issued a permit. permit and whether the permit issued is a fixed duration permit
or a lifetime permit. Within five days of the date a permit is issued, the sheriff shall send a copy
of the permit to the State Bureau of Investigation.
(c) Except as provided otherwise by this subsection, the list of permit holders and the
information collected by the sheriff to process an application for a permit are confidential and
are not a public record under G.S. 132-1. The sheriff shall make the list of permit holders and the
permit information available upon request to all State and local law enforcement agencies. The
State Bureau of Investigation shall make the list of permit holders and the information collected
by the sheriff to process an application for a permit available to law enforcement officers and
clerks of court on a statewide system.
(d) A sheriff shall provide any change of permanent address received pursuant to
G.S. 14-415.11(d) to the State Bureau of Investigation for inclusion in the statewide system
required by subsection (c) of this section."
SECTION 2.9. G.S. 14-415.18(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The sheriff of the county where the permit was issued or the sheriff of the county
where the person resides may revoke a permit subsequent to a hearing for any of the following
reasons:
(1) Fraud or intentional and material misrepresentation in the obtaining of a
permit.
(2) Misuse of a permit, including lending or giving a permit or a duplicate permit
to another person, materially altering a permit, or using a permit with the intent
to unlawfully cause harm to a person or property. It shall not be considered
misuse of a permit to provide a duplicate of the permit to a vender vendor for
record-keeping purposes.
(3) The doing of an act or existence of a condition which would have been
grounds for the denial of the permit by the sheriff.
(4) The violation of any of the terms of this Article.
(5) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-369, s. 20, effective October 1, 2013.
Page 4 House Bill 674-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) The person is no longer a resident of the State.
A permittee may appeal the revocation, or nonrenewal revocation of a permit by petitioning
a district court judge of the district in which the applicant resides. The determination by the court,
on appeal, shall be upon the facts, the law, and the reasonableness of the sheriff's refusal. The
determination by the court shall be final for the purpose of appeal."
SECTION 2.10. G.S. 14-415.19 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-415.19. Fees.
(a) The permit fees assessed under this Article are payable to the sheriff. The sheriff shall
transmit the proceeds of these fees to the county finance officer to be remitted or credited by the
county finance officer in accordance with the provisions of this section. Except as otherwise
provided by this section, the permit fees are as follows:

Application fee ............................................................................ $80.00
Renewal or reissuance fee ........................................................... $75.00
Duplicate permit fee .................................................................... $15.00

The county finance officer shall remit forty-five dollars ($45.00) of each new application fee
and forty dollars ($40.00) of each renewal or reissuance fee assessed under this subsection to the
North Carolina Department of Public Safety for the costs of State and federal criminal record
checks performed in connection with processing applications and for the implementation of the
provisions of this Article. The remaining thirty-five dollars ($35.00) of each application or
renewal application, renewal, or reissuance fee shall be used by the sheriff to pay the costs of
administering this Article and for other law enforcement purposes. The county shall expend the
restricted funds for these purposes only.
(a1) The permit fees for a retired sworn law enforcement officer who provides the
information required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection to the sheriff, in addition to
any other information required under this Article, are as follows:

Application fee ............................................................................ $45.00
Renewal or reissuance fee ........................................................... $40.00

(1) A copy of the officer's letter of retirement from either the North Carolina
Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System or the North Carolina
Local Governmental Employees' Retirement System.
(2) Written documentation from the head of the agency where the person was
previously employed indicating that the person was neither involuntarily
terminated nor under administrative or criminal investigation within six
months of retirement.
The county finance officer shall remit the proceeds of the fees assessed under this subsection
to the North Carolina Department of Public Safety to cover the cost of performing the State and
federal criminal record checks performed in connection with processing applications and for the
implementation of the provisions of this Article.
(b) An additional fee, not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00), shall be collected by the sheriff
from an applicant for a permit to pay for the costs of processing the applicant's fingerprints, if
fingerprints were required to be taken. This fee shall be retained by the sheriff."
SECTION 2.11. G.S. 14-269(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) It shall be unlawful for any person willfully and intentionally to willfully and
intentionally carry any pistol or gun concealed about his or her person any pistol or gun except
in the following circumstances:
(1) The person is on the person's own premises.
House Bill 674-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The deadly weapon is a handgun, the person has a concealed handgun permit
issued in accordance with Article 54B of this Chapter or considered valid
under G.S. 14-415.24, and the person is carrying the concealed handgun in
accordance with the scope of the concealed handgun permit as set out in
G.S. 14-415.11(c).
(3) The deadly weapon is a handgun and the person is a military permittee as
defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a) G.S. 14-415.10(2b) who provides to the law
enforcement officer proof of deployment as required under
G.S. 14-415.11(a)."
SECTION 2.12. This Part becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to all
permits issued or renewed on or after that date.

PART III. REVISE LAW ON LAPSE OF CONCEALED CARRY PERMIT
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 14-415.16(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) If the permittee does not apply to renew the permit prior to its expiration date, but
does apply to renew the permit within 60 less than 180 days after the permit expires, the sheriff
may shall waive the requirement of taking another firearms safety and training course. If the
permittee applies to renew the permit between 180 days and one year after the permit expires,
the sheriff may waive the requirement of taking another firearms and safety training course. This
subsection does not extend the expiration date of the permit."
SECTION 3.2. This Part becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to renewal
applications submitted on or after that date.

PART IV. PROPERTY PROTECTION ACT/DVPO
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 50B-3.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 50B-3.1. Surrender and disposal of firearms; violations; exemptions.
(a) Required Surrender of Firearms. – Upon issuance of an emergency or ex parte order
pursuant to this Chapter, the court shall order the defendant to surrender to the sheriff all firearms,
machine guns, ammunition, permits to purchase firearms, and permits to carry concealed firearms
that are in the care, custody, possession, ownership, or control of the defendant if the court finds
any of the following factors:
(1) The use or threatened use of a deadly weapon by the defendant or a pattern of
prior conduct involving the use or threatened use of violence with a firearm
against persons.
(2) Threats to seriously injure or kill the aggrieved party or minor child by the
defendant.
(3) Threats to commit suicide by the defendant.
(4) Serious injuries inflicted upon the aggrieved party or minor child by the
defendant.
…
(d) Surrender. – Upon service of the order, the defendant shall immediately surrender to
the sheriff possession of all firearms, machine guns, ammunition, permits to purchase firearms,
and permits to carry concealed firearms that are in the care, custody, possession, ownership, or
control of the defendant. In the event that weapons cannot be surrendered at the time the order is
served, the defendant shall surrender the firearms, ammunitions, and permits to the sheriff within
24 hours of service at a time and place specified by the sheriff. The sheriff shall store the firearms
or contract with a licensed firearms dealer to provide storage.
(1) If the court orders the defendant to surrender firearms, ammunition, and
permits, the court shall inform the plaintiff and the defendant of the terms of
the protective order and include these terms on the face of the order, including
that the defendant is prohibited from possessing, purchasing, or receiving or
Page 6 House Bill 674-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
attempting to possess, purchase, or receive a firearm for so long as the
protective order or any successive protective order is in effect. The terms of
the order shall include instructions as to how the defendant may request
retrieval of any firearms, ammunition, and permits surrendered to the sheriff
when the protective order is no longer in effect. The terms shall also include
notice of the penalty for violation of G.S. 14-269.8.
(2) The sheriff may charge the defendant a reasonable fee for the storage of any
firearms and ammunition taken pursuant to a protective order. The fees are
payable to the sheriff. The sheriff shall transmit the proceeds of these fees to
the county finance officer. The fees shall be used by the sheriff to pay the costs
of administering this section and for other law enforcement purposes. The
county shall expend the restricted funds for these purposes only. The sheriff
shall not release firearms, ammunition, or permits without a court order
granting the release. The defendant must remit all fees owed prior to the
authorized return of any firearms, ammunition, or permits. The sheriff shall
not incur any civil or criminal liability for alleged damage or deterioration due
to storage or transportation of any firearms or ammunition held pursuant to
this section.
(d1) Transfer to Licensed Firearms Dealer. – After the defendant surrenders possession of
all firearms, machine guns, ammunition, and permits to the sheriff pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section, the defendant may enter into an agreement with a qualified licensed firearms dealer
to take possession of the surrendered items from the custody of the sheriff if (i) the defendant is
the owner of the items and (ii) the items have been in the custody of the sheriff at least 15 days.
The defendant shall authorize the qualified licensed firearms dealer to submit the form provided
for in this subsection requesting the transfer of the firearms, machine guns, and ammunition to
the sheriff currently storing the items. The qualified licensed firearms dealer must present the
completed form and a copy of the dealer's valid federal firearms license to the sheriff, who shall
have 24 hours to facilitate the transfer of the firearms, machine guns, and ammunition to the
dealer. Any funds received from the sale of a firearm, machine gun, or ammunition by a
defendant pursuant to this subsection are the property of the defendant. The defendant's permits
to purchase firearms and permits to carry concealed firearms shall remain in the care and custody
of the sheriff as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
At the time a qualified licensed firearms dealer takes possession of the firearms, machine
guns, and ammunition, the dealer shall provide a copy of the record required to be maintained
under federal law upon the receipt or disposition of the firearm, machine gun, or ammunition to
both the sheriff and the owner of the firearms, machine guns, and ammunition.
A qualified licensed firearms dealer that accepts firearms, machine guns, and ammunition
pursuant to this subsection shall not (i) release the firearms, machine guns, or ammunition to the
defendant unless the motion for a protective order is dismissed or any order of surrender has
expired or (ii) transfer possession of the firearms, machine guns, or ammunition to any person
the dealer knows or reasonably should know will allow the defendant to exercise care, custody,
possession, ownership, or control of the firearms, machine guns, or ammunition, and any
violation of this prohibition is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
The Administrative Office of the Courts shall create a form for use in transferring firearms,
machine guns, and ammunition from the custody of the sheriff to a qualified licensed firearms
dealer pursuant to this subsection. The form shall require the notarized signatures of both the
defendant and the qualified licensed firearms dealer and shall allow for either the storage or sale
of the firearms, machine guns, and ammunition by the qualified licensed firearms dealer. The
form shall also include information concerning the defendant's rights to recover the surrendered
firearms, machine guns, or ammunition.
House Bill 674-Second Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The sheriff shall not charge a fee for the first 15 days of storage for any items transferred to
a qualified licensed firearms dealer pursuant to this subsection.
(e) Retrieval. – If the court does not enter a protective order when the ex parte or
emergency order expires, the defendant may retrieve any weapons surrendered to the sheriff or
the qualified licensed firearms dealer unless the court finds that the defendant is precluded from
owning or possessing a firearm pursuant to State or federal law or final disposition of any pending
criminal charges committed against the person that is the subject of the current protective order.
(f) Motion Request for Return. – The defendant may request the return of any firearms,
ammunition, or permits surrendered by filing a motion with the court submitting a written request
with the sheriff or the qualified licensed firearms dealer who has control of the firearms,
ammunition, or permits at the expiration of the current order or final disposition of any pending
criminal charges committed against the person that is the subject of the current protective order
and not later than 90 days 30 days after the expiration of the current order or final disposition of
any pending criminal charges committed against the person that is the subject of the current
protective order. Upon receipt of the motion, request, the sheriff or the qualified licensed firearms
dealer shall conduct a check through the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
(NICS). If the results of the NICS check provide grounds that preclude the defendant from
owning or possessing a firearm under State or federal law, the sheriff or the qualified licensed
firearms dealer shall file a motion with the court on a form created by the Administrative Office
of the Courts requesting the court make a determination whether the defendant is precluded from
owning or possessing a firearm and shall not return the firearms, ammunition, or permits until
the court has ruled on the motion. Upon receipt of the motion, the court shall schedule a hearing
and provide written notice to the plaintiff who shall have the right to appear and be heard and to
the sheriff or the qualified licensed firearms dealer who has control of the firearms, ammunition,
or permits. The court shall determine whether the defendant is subject to any State or federal law
or court order that precludes the defendant from owning or possessing a firearm. The inquiry
shall include:
(1) Whether the protective order has been renewed.
(2) Whether the defendant is subject to any other protective orders.
(3) Whether the defendant is disqualified from owning or possessing a firearm
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 922 or any State law.
(4) Whether the defendant has any pending criminal charges, in either State or
federal court, committed against the person that is the subject of the current
protective order.
The court shall deny the return of firearms, ammunition, or permits if the court finds that the
defendant is precluded from owning or possessing a firearm pursuant to State or federal law or
if the defendant has any pending criminal charges, in either State or federal court, committed
against the person that is the subject of the current protective order until the final disposition of
those charges.
(g) Motion for Return by Third-Party Owner. – A third-party owner of firearms,
ammunition, or permits who is otherwise eligible to possess such items may file a motion
requesting the return to said third party of any such items in the possession of the sheriff or the
qualified licensed firearms dealer seized as a result of the entry of a domestic violence protective
order. The motion must be filed not later than 30 days after the seizure of the items by the sheriff.
Upon receipt of the third party's motion, the court shall schedule a hearing and provide written
notice to all parties and the sheriff. sheriff or the qualified licensed firearms dealer. The court
shall order return of the items to the third party unless the court determines that the third party is
disqualified from owning or possessing said items pursuant to State or federal law. If the court
denies the return of said items to the third party, the items shall be disposed of by the sheriff or
the qualified licensed firearms dealer as provided in subsection (h) of this section.
Page 8 House Bill 674-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(h) Disposal of Firearms. – If the defendant does not file a motion requesting submit a
written request for the return of any firearms, ammunition, or permits surrendered within the time
period prescribed by this section, if the court determines that the defendant is precluded from
regaining possession of any firearms, ammunition, or permits surrendered, or if the defendant or
third-party owner fails to remit all fees owed for the storage of the firearms or ammunition within
30 days of the request for the return of firearms, ammunition, or permits or entry of the an order
granting the return of the firearms, ammunition, or permits, the sheriff or the qualified licensed
firearms dealer who has control of the firearms, ammunition, or permits shall give notice to the
defendant, and the sheriff or the qualified licensed firearms dealer shall apply to the court for an
order of disposition of the firearms, ammunition, or permits. The judge, after a hearing, may
order the disposition of the firearms, ammunition, or permits in one or more of the ways
authorized by law, including subdivision (4), (4b), (5), or (6) of G.S. 14-269.1. Additionally, for
firearms and ammunition surrendered to a qualified licensed firearms dealer under subsection
(d1) of this section, the judge may order the firearms and ammunition disposed of by sale by the
qualified licensed firearms dealer. If a sale by the sheriff or a qualified licensed firearms dealer
does occur, occur pursuant to this subsection, any proceeds from the sale after deducting any
costs associated with the sale, sale and any storage fees owed to the sheriff or the qualified
licensed firearms dealer, and in accordance with all applicable State and federal law, shall be
provided to the defendant, if requested by the defendant by motion made before the hearing or at
the hearing and if ordered by the judge.defendant.
(i) Failure to Surrender or Disclose. – It is unlawful for any person subject to a protective
order prohibiting the possession or purchase of firearms to:to do any of the following:
(1) Fail to surrender all firearms, ammunition, permits to purchase firearms, and
permits to carry concealed firearms to the sheriff as ordered by the court;court.
(2) Fail to disclose all information pertaining to the possession of firearms,
ammunition, and permits to purchase and permits to carry concealed firearms
as requested by the court; orcourt.
(3) Provide false information to the court pertaining to any of these items.
…
(l) Construction. – Nothing in this section is intended to limit the discretion of the court
in granting additional relief as provided in other sections of this Chapter.
(m) Qualified Licensed Firearms Dealer. – For purposes of this section, the term
"qualified licensed firearms dealer" shall mean a federally licensed firearms dealer that meets all
of the following requirements:
(1) Operates a business in a commercial building located in the State.
(2) Is open to the public.
(3) Regularly engages in the purchase and sale of firearms with members of the
public."
SECTION 4.2. This Part becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to orders
issued on or after that date.

PART V. LIABILITY PROTECTION FOR SAFETY HOLD AGREEMENTS
SECTION 5.1. Article 53B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-409.44. Safety hold agreements.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Federal firearms licensee. – A person licensed as a dealer, manufacturer, or
importer under 18 U.S.C. § 923.
(2) Safety hold agreement. – A private transaction between a federal firearms
licensee and an individual firearm owner in which the licensee takes physical
possession of the owner's lawfully possessed firearm at the owner's request,
House Bill 674-Second Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
holds the firearm for an agreed-upon period of time, and returns the firearm
to the owner according to the terms of the agreement.
(b) Authorization. – A federal firearms licensee may enter into a safety hold agreement
with a firearm owner. The safety hold agreement is not required to include the payment of a fee
in exchange for holding or storing a firearm.
(c) Liability. – No individual shall have a cause of action against a federal firearm
licensee for any act or omission arising from a safety hold agreement which results in personal
injury or death of any individual, including the return of any firearm to the individual firearm
owner at the termination of a safety hold agreement. The immunity set forth in this subsection
does not apply to any action arising from a safety hold agreement if that action is the result of the
negligent or reckless storage of the firearm or otherwise unlawful conduct on the part of the
federal firearms licensee.
(d) Unclaimed Firearm. – Except as otherwise prohibited by law, if an individual firearm
owner does not reclaim his or her firearm at the termination of a safety hold agreement, the
federal firearms licensee may sell or otherwise dispose of the firearm.
(e) Forms. – The State Bureau of Investigation shall develop a modifiable form that may
be used by federal firearms licensees for entering into safety hold agreements. The Bureau shall
make copies of the form required under this subsection available on the Bureau's website.
(f) Confidentiality. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as making a safety hold
agreement entered into in accordance with subsection (a) of this section a public record for
purposes of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Except as otherwise agreed to by the parties to
the agreement, a safety hold agreement entered into in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section is confidential.
(g) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a federal
firearms licensee to (i) take possession of an unlawfully possessed firearm or (ii) return a firearm
to a person prohibited by law from possessing a firearm."
SECTION 5.2. The State Bureau of Investigation shall adopt rules consistent with
the provisions of this act. The Bureau may use the procedure set forth in G.S. 150B-21.1 to adopt
any rules as required by this section.
SECTION 5.3. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART VI. AUTHORIZE THE STORAGE AND USE OF DEFENSIVE DEVICES IN
BIOMETRIC SAFES FOR SCHOOLS
SECTION 6.1. G.S. 14-269(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) This prohibition shall not apply to the following persons:
…
(10) A public school unit or nonpublic school employee who meets the following
requirements:
a. The employee has completed annual training for a device
classification, as required by G.S. 115C-105.52, to access any
defensive device stored in a locked container that is securely affixed
to the premises of the educational property and accessible by a
biometric lock that limits access to only authorized employees with
training for defensive devices stored within the container or law
enforcement officers.
b. The employee accesses and uses a defensive device in response to a
threatening situation in which force was justified pursuant to
G.S. 14-51.3."
SECTION 6.2. G.S. 14-269.2(g) reads as rewritten:
"(g) This section shall not apply to any of the following:
…
Page 10 House Bill 674-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) A weapon that is a defensive device stored on educational property, as
provided in G.S. 115C-105.52, or use of those devices by authorized
employees in response to a threatening situation in which force was justified
pursuant to G.S. 14-51.3."
SECTION 6.3. G.S. 115C-105.52 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-105.52. School Defensive device storage and school crisis kits.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Authorized employee. – An employee of a public school unit or nonpublic
school who meets all of the following requirements on an annual basis:
a. Receives training meeting the standards established by the Center for
Safer Schools for a device classification.
b. Is designated by the public school unit as an employee that may access
a defensive device storage container using that employee's biometric
information.
(2) Defensive device. – A non-lethal device used to defend against the imminent
use of unlawful force. A defensive device may include, but is not limited to, a
disabling chemical spray, an electronic incapacitation device, or any other
non-lethal device.
(3) Defensive device storage container. – A locked container that is securely
affixed to the premises of the educational property and accessible by a
biometric lock that limits access to only authorized employees with training
for any device classifications stored within the container or law enforcement
officers.
(4) Device classification. – A classification of a defensive device corresponding
to the required training standards established by the Center for Safer Schools
for use of that device by an employee of the school.
(5) Nonpublic school. – A school that meets the requirements of Part 1 or 2 of
Article 39 of this Chapter.
(b) Any public school unit or nonpublic school may provide for defensive devices on the
educational property of the school if those defensive devices are stored in a defensive device
storage container. The administrator for each school may affix one or more defensive device
storage containers at appropriate locations in the school and may post signs alerting the public to
the presence of the defensive device storage containers.
(c) No employee shall be required to complete training for any defensive device,
regardless of device classification. Only employees that have completed the annual training for
a device classification shall be eligible for biometric access to a defensive device storage
container with that device classification.
(d) A public school unit, nonpublic school, or authorized employee shall not be liable in
civil damages for any act or omission related to a defensive device unless the act or omission
amounts to gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing.
(e) The Center for Safer Schools, in consultation with the Department of Public
Instruction and the Department of Public Safety, shall develop and adopt policies on the
placement of school crisis kits in schools and on the contents of those kits. The kits shall include,
at a minimum, basic first-aid supplies and communications devices.
(f) The principal of each school, in coordination with the law enforcement agencies that
are part of the public school unit's School Risk Management Plan, may place one or more crisis
kits at appropriate locations in the school."
SECTION 6.4. G.S. 143B-1209.59(c), as recodified under Section 3J.17 of S.L.
2024-57, reads as rewritten:
"(c) Powers and Duties. – The Center for Safer Schools shall have the following duties,
and all other powers and duties provided in Article 8C of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes:
House Bill 674-Second Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(11) Establish classifications of defensive devices and, in collaboration with the
North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission, establish minimum training standards for school employees to
qualify to access and use that classification of defensive device in a storage
container with biometric locks. The minimum training standards shall be made
publicly available for use of law enforcement or private entities to provide
training meeting those standards."
SECTION 6.5. Public school units awarded school safety grants for safety
equipment may use those grants to purchase defensive devices and defensive device storage
containers and associated training for public school employees.
SECTION 6.6. The Center for Safer Schools shall establish classifications and
training standards required by this Part no later than January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6.7. Sections 6.1, 6.2, and 6.3 of this Part become effective January 1,
2026, and apply to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this Part is effective
when it becomes law.

PART VII. BROADEN DOOR LOCK EXEMPTION FOR CERTAIN BUSINESSES
SECTION 7. G.S. 143-143.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-143.4. Door lock exemption for certain businesses.
(a) Notwithstanding this Article or any other law to the contrary, any business entity
licensed to sell automatic weapons as a federal firearms dealer that is in the business of selling
firearms or ammunition and that operates a firing range which rents firearms and sells
ammunition shall be exempt from the door lock requirements of Chapter 10 of Volume 1 of the
North Carolina State Building Code when issued a permit to that effect by the Office of the State
Fire Marshal in accordance with this section.
…."

PART VIII. MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 8.1. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 8.2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 12 House Bill 674-Second Edition